Florida, session 2026, HB95.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (16) is added to section 493.6102,
Florida Statutes, to read:
493.6102 Inapplicability of this chapter.—This chapter
shall not apply to:
(16) Any person who on a voluntary basis provides armed
security services on the premises of a church or ecclesiastical
or denominational organization having an established physical
place of worship in this state at which nonprofit religious
services and activities are regularly conducted, if:
(a) The person providing the armed security services holds
a valid license to carry a concealed weapon or firearm issued
pursuant s. 790.06.
(b) The security services are provided exclusively on the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb95-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 95 2026
premises of a church or ecclesiastical or denominational
organization, including any property owned or leased by the
church or ecclesiastical or denominational organization for
worship, education, or religious activities.
(c) The person providing the armed security services did
not receive any compensation for such services. For purposes of
this paragraph, the term "compensation" does not include
reimbursement for reasonable expenses actually incurred and
related to the cost of training or the cost of equipment
necessary for providing the security services.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb95-00